test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-nimi_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - nimi: # Noun nimi 'eng name /est nimi/fin nimi' - full paradigm
     nimi+N+Sg+Nom: nimi
     nimi+N+Sg+Gen: nime
     nimi+N+Sg+Par: nimme
     nimi+N+Sg+Ill: nimme
     nimi+N+Sg+Ine: nimen
     nimi+N+Sg+Ela: nimest
     nimi+N+Sg+All: nimele
     nimi+N+Sg+Ade: nimel
     nimi+N+Sg+Abl: nimelt
     nimi+N+Sg+Tra: nimes
     nimi+N+Sg+Ter: nimeniq
     nimi+N+Sg+Abe: nimeldäq
     nimi+N+Sg+Com: nimegaq
     nimi+N+Pl+Nom: nimeq
     nimi+N+Pl+Gen: nimmi
     nimi+N+Pl+Par: nimmi
     nimi+N+Pl+Ill: nimmihe
     nimi+N+Pl+Ine: nimin
     nimi+N+Pl+Ela: nimist
     nimi+N+Pl+All: nimile
     nimi+N+Pl+Ade: nimil
     nimi+N+Pl+Abl: nimilt
     nimi+N+Pl+Tra: nimis
     nimi+N+Pl+Ter: niminiq
     nimi+N+Pl+Abe: nimildäq
     nimi+N+Pl+Com: nimmigaq
